Utah statutes.
49-22-308.   Defined benefit annual cost-of-living adjustment.
(1)  The office shall make an annual cost-of-living adjustment to:
(a)  an original allowance paid under Section 49-22-305, if the allowance has
been paid for at least one year; and
(b)  an original payment made to an alternate payee under a domestic relations
order, if the payment is to be paid as a percentage of the allowance rather
than a specific dollar amount.
(2) (a)  The original allowance shall be increased by the annual increase in
the Consumer Price Index up to a maximum of 2.5%.
(b)  Annual increases in the Consumer Price Index in excess of 2.5% shall be
accumulated and used in subsequent adjustments when the annual increase in the
Consumer Price Index is less than 2.5%.
(3)  The Consumer Price Index used in calculating adjustments shall be a
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index average as
determined by the board.
(4)  The cost-of-living adjustment made under this section may not decrease
the allowance.
